Nebraska, session 109, LB67.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 4 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Sexual Assault Emergency Care Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Sexual Assault Emergency Care Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) Director means the Director of Public Health of the Division of
Public Health or the director's designee;
(3) Emergency care for a sexual assault survivor means a medical
examination, procedure, or service provided by a hospital to a sexual
assault survivor following a sexual assault;
(4) Emergency contraception means a federal Food and Drug
Administration-approved drug administered after sexual intercourse that
prevents pregnancy but which does not disrupt an existing pregnancy;
(5) Hospital means a hospital licensed under the Health Care
Facility Licensure Act;
(6) Medically and factually accurate and objective means verified or
supported by the weight of research conducted in compliance with accepted
scientific methods and standards, the currently accepted professional
standards of care and established protocols for medical care following
sexual assault as established in section 29-4311, and recognized as
accurate and objective by leading professional organizations and agencies
with relevant expertise in the field of obstetrics and gynecology;
(7) Sexual assault means any sexual assault that involves sexual
penetration as defined in section 28-318 or substantially similar
conduct; and
(8) Sexual assault survivor means an individual who is a victim of
sexual assault and who reports such sexual assault to a hospital,
including anonymous reporting pursuant to section 28-902.
Sec. 3. (1) A hospital which provides emergency care for a sexual
assault survivor shall:
(a) Provide the sexual assault survivor with medically and factually
accurate and objective written and oral information about emergency
-2-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
contraception;
(b) Provide the sexual assault survivor with written and oral
information in a language the sexual assault survivor understands about
the option to receive emergency contraception at the hospital; and
(c) Dispense a complete course of emergency contraception, in
accordance with the currently accepted professional standards of care and
established protocols for sexual assault forensic medical examinations,
to the sexual assault survivor, unless declined by the survivor.
(2) A hospital which provides emergency care for a sexual assault
survivor shall provide training for all personnel involved in such care
regarding the provision of medically and factually accurate and objective
information about emergency contraception.
(3) A hospital which provides emergency care for a sexual assault
survivor shall ensure compliance with the Sexual Assault Emergency Care
Act and shall develop policies and procedures, as necessary, to ensure
compliance with the act in the case of moral or religious objections by
individual health care providers.
Sec. 4. (1) Any complaint regarding compliance with the Sexual
Assault Emergency Care Act may be filed with the department.
(2)(a) The department shall review complaints received regarding
failure of a hospital to provide services in compliance with the Sexual
Assault Emergency Care Act to determine the action to be taken to satisfy
the complaint. In making a determination as to whether or not to conduct
an investigation, the department may consider factors such as:
(i) Whether the complaint pertains to a matter within the authority
of the department to enforce;
(ii) Whether the circumstances indicate that a complaint is made in
good faith and is not malicious, frivolous, or vexatious;
(iii) Whether the complaint is timely or has been delayed too long
to justify present evaluation of its merit;
(iv) Whether the complainant may be a necessary witness if action is
-3-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
taken and is willing to identify himself or herself and come forward to
testify if action is taken; or
(v) Whether the information provided or within the knowledge of the
complainant is sufficient to provide a reasonable basis to believe that a
violation has occurred or to secure necessary evidence from other
sources.
(b) A complaint submitted to the department shall be confidential. A
person submitting a complaint shall be immune from criminal or civil
liability of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for submitting a
complaint or for disclosure of documents, records, or other information
to the department pursuant to this section.
(3) The department shall retain all complaints it receives regarding
failure of a hospital to provide services in compliance with the Sexual
Assault Emergency Care Act. The department shall provide a report
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature by December 1 of every
even-numbered year that includes, but is not limited to, the annual
number of complaints, the nature of each complaint, and the hospitals for
which those complaints were made. The report shall also include the
determination of the department's investigation and any disciplinary
action or penalties applied. The report shall not include any personal
health or identifying information.
(4)(a) If the department determines after investigation of a
complaint that a hospital has failed to provide services in compliance
with the Sexual Assault Emergency Care Act, the department shall send to
the hospital, by certified mail to the last address shown on the records
of the department, a notice setting forth the determination, the
particular reasons for the determination, including a specific
description of the nature of the violation and the provision of law
violated, and the type of disciplinary action which is pending, which may
include the penalties described in subsection (5) of this section. Within
fifteen days after service of the notice, the hospital shall notify the
-4-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
department in writing that the hospital (i) desires to contest the notice
and requests an informal conference with a representative of the
department in person or by other means at the request of the hospital,
(ii) desires to contest the notice and requests an informal conference
with a representative of a peer review organization with which the
department has contracted, (iii) desires to contest the notice and
requests a hearing, or (iv) does not contest the notice. If the
department does not receive such notification within such fifteen-day
period, the action of the department shall be final.
(b) If an informal conference is requested pursuant to subdivision
(4)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section, the director shall assign to conduct
the informal conference, respectively, a representative of the department
other than the individual who did the investigation upon which the notice
is based or a representative of the peer review organization. The
representative shall hold an informal conference with the hospital within
thirty days after the department's receipt of such request. Within twenty
working days after the conclusion of the conference, the representative
shall report in writing to the department the representative's conclusion
regarding whether to affirm, modify, or dismiss the notice and the
specific reasons for the conclusion and shall provide a copy of the
report to the director and the hospital.
(c) Within ten working days after receiving a report under
subdivision (4)(b) of this section, the department shall consider such
report and affirm, modify, or dismiss the notice and shall state the
specific reasons for such decision, including, if applicable, the
specific reasons for not adopting the conclusion of the representative as
contained in such report. The department shall provide the hospital with
a copy of such decision by certified mail to the last address shown in
the records of the department. If the hospital desires to contest an
affirmed or modified notice, the hospital shall notify the director in
writing within five working days after receiving such decision that the
-5-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
hospital requests a hearing.
(d) If a hospital successfully demonstrates during an informal
conference or a hearing that the deficiencies should not have been cited
in the notice, (i) the deficiencies shall be removed from the notice and
the deficiency statement and (ii) any sanction imposed solely as a result
of those cited deficiencies shall be rescinded.
(e)(i) If the hospital requests a hearing under subdivision (4)(a)
(iii) of this section, the department shall hold a hearing and give the
hospital the right to present such evidence as may be proper. On the
basis of such evidence, the director shall affirm, modify, or set aside
the determination. A copy of such decision setting forth the findings of
facts and the particular reasons upon which the decision is based shall
be sent by either registered or certified mail to the hospital. The
decision shall become final thirty days after the copy is mailed unless
the hospital, within such thirty-day period, appeals the decision under
subdivision (4)(f) of this section.
(ii) The procedure governing hearings authorized by this section
shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
by the department. A full and complete record shall be kept of all
proceedings. Witnesses may be subpoenaed by either party and shall be
allowed fees at a rate prescribed by rule and regulation.
(f) Any party to a decision of the department under the Sexual
Assault Emergency Care Act may appeal such decision. The appeal shall be
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) The department shall:
(a) For the first substantiated complaint:
(i) Issue a written warning to the hospital stating that it has
failed to provide services in compliance with the Sexual Assault
Emergency Care Act; and
(ii) Require the hospital to correct the deficiency that led to the
complaint; and
-6-

LB67 LB67
2025 2025
(b) For the second and subsequent substantiated complaints, impose a
fine of one thousand dollars on the hospital:
(i) Per sexual assault survivor who the department finds to have
been denied medically and factually accurate and objective written and
oral information about emergency contraception or who the department
finds was not offered emergency contraception in violation of subsection
(1) of section 3 of this act; or
(ii) Per month from the date of the complaint alleging noncompliance
until the hospital provides training in compliance with subsection (2) of
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-7-